Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 10

Multi-County Districts Generally

69-5-1001. Application by petitions — Engineer — Viewers.

Where a proposed or desired improvement will require a location in more than one (1) county, applications by petition shall be made to the county court of each of the counties as provided by part 1 of this chapter for applications where the improvement to be made lies wholly in one (1) county, and signed by one (1) or more persons owning lands lying in each county to be affected, or assessed for the proposed improvement.

When such petitions have been filed, the county court of the county in which the larger or largest percent of the lands to be affected by such improvement lies shall appoint a competent engineer to make survey, of such proposed improvement district in the same manner as when the proposed improvement lies wholly in one (1) county, and such engineer shall proceed in the same manner as when the improvement lies wholly in one (1) county, and the engineer shall make out duplicate reports of the survey and work and file one (1) with each of the county clerks in the counties where the petition for such improvement is filed. After the reports of the engineer are so filed, the county court of each of the counties shall proceed as provided in part 1 of this chapter for improvement districts located wholly in one (1) county until the point in the proceeding is reached when viewers are to be appointed to assess damages, as provided by part 2 of this chapter. As to such viewers, the county court of the county in which the larger or largest percent of the lands to be affected or assessed on account of such improvement is located, or lies, shall appoint two (2) viewers, and one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the county court of each of the other counties concerned, if more than one (1) other county, and if only one (1) other, by the county court of such county, the viewers to have the same qualifications, as provided for viewers in part 2 of this chapter. When so appointed, the viewers shall meet as soon as practicable at some convenient point to be designated by the clerk of the county, the court of which appoints two (2) of the viewers, and shall then proceed to assess damages, as provided in part 2 of this chapter for districts lying in one (1) county only, the engineer rendering them like assistance, as provided in part 2 of this chapter. When their work is completed, the viewers shall make out one (1) copy of their report for each of the counties, signing same, and shall file a copy of such report with each of the county clerks of the counties where such petitions have been filed for the establishment of such improvement or district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 29; Shan., § 3871a116; Code 1932, § 4345; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1501; T.C.A. §69-6-1001.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. Multi-county districts, alternative procedure, §69-5-1006 and title 69, ch. 5, part 11.

69-5-1002. Proceedings after reports of viewers — Assessment of lands.

When the viewers have so reported, each of the county courts shall proceed as provided in other cases in parts 1 and 2 of this chapter until the point is reached to appoint commissioners to make assessments and apportion them as to the lands affected, when the county court of the county in which the larger or largest percent of the land lies to be assessed or affected, shall appoint two (2) of the commissioners, one (1) of these appointees to be a competent engineer, and the other county court, or courts, shall appoint one (1) of the commissioners each, the commissioners so appointed to have the same qualifications as provided in part 3 of this chapter.

When so appointed, the commissioners shall, as soon as practicable, meet at some convenient place to be designated by the county clerk of the county, the court of which has appointed two (2) of the commissioners, one (1) being an engineer, and shall then proceed to assess the lands in such district, and apportion the assessments in the same manner as provided in part 3 of this chapter where such district lies wholly in one (1) county, and shall report in like manner, and shall file a copy of their report with the clerk of each county having lands within such improvement district.

When such commissioners have so reported, each of such county courts shall proceed as to the reports and in levying assessments, as provided by part 3 of this chapter, in cases of districts lying in one (1) county only.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 30; Shan., § 3871a117; Code 1932, § 4346; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1502; T.C.A. §69-6-1002.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-1003. Board of directors.

In cases of districts so lying in more than one (1) county, the board of directors of such districts shall consist of one (1) member from each county, to be appointed by the county court of such county, and the county mayor of each of the counties shall be a member of such board of directors, and the qualifications, powers, and duties of such board of directors shall be the same as provided by parts 6 through 9 of this chapter for boards of directors and members of boards in improvement districts lying entirely in one (1) county.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 31; Shan., § 3871a118; Code 1932, § 4347; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1503; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-1003.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-1004. Removal of viewers, commissioners, and directors.

The county courts have the same right to remove the viewers, commissioners, and directors appointed by such court, and to appoint others in their stead, and to fill vacancies that the county courts have where such improvement district lies wholly in one (1) county.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 31; Shan., § 3871a119; Code 1932, § 4348; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1504; T.C.A. §69-6-1004.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-1005. Chair and secretary-treasurer.

The county mayor of the county in which the larger or largest percent of the lands of such improvement district lies shall be chair of such board of directors, with authority to call meetings of the board. The board shall elect one (1) of the appointed directors secretary and treasurer of the board of directors, and such treasurer shall give bond, as provided by part 6 of this chapter, such bond or a duplicate of same to be filed with the county clerk in each of the counties and recorded in the drainage record, the bond to be taken before and approved by the county court of the county in which the larger or largest percent of the lands of the district lies.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 31; Shan., § 3871a120; Code 1932, § 4349; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-150; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-1005.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-1006. Map of district.

The engineer of such district shall show in the engineer's report upon the map of the district the location of the line or lines between counties, and show clearly what tracts of land within such district lie in each of the counties of the district.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 8; Shan., § 3871a170; mod. Code 1932, § 4406; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1514; T.C.A. §69-6-1006.